installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.aff
SFX U Y 61
SFX U   ec          ce         ec
SFX U   ec          ci         ec
SFX U   ec          ce         ec
SFX U   ec          cem        ec
SFX U   ec          cu         ec
SFX U   ec          cum        ec
SFX U   ec          cich       ec
SFX U   0           e          [^e]c
SFX U   0           i          [^e]c
SFX U   0           em         [^e]c
SFX U   0           u          [^e]c
SFX U   0           um         [^e]c
SFX U   0           ich        [^e]c
SFX U   0           e          [^acdent]
SFX U   0           i          [^acdenti]
SFX U   0           ovi        [^acdent]
SFX U   0           em         [^acdent]
SFX U   0           u          [^acen]
SFX U   0           um         [^acen]
SFX U   0           ich        [^acdentsx]
SFX U   0           ech        [sx]
SFX U   0           y          x
SFX U   a           e          a
SFX U   a           ovi        a
SFX U   a           em         a
SFX U   a           ove        a
SFX U   a           u          a
SFX U   a           um         a
SFX U   a           i          a
SFX U   a           ich        a
SFX U   d           de         d
SFX U   d           di         d
SFX U   d           dem        d
SFX U   d           dich       d
SFX U   n           ne         len
SFX U   n           ni         len
SFX U   n           nem        len
SFX U   0           u          len
SFX U   0           um         len
SFX U   n           nich       len
SFX U   en          ne         [^l]en
SFX U   en          ni         [^l]en
SFX U   en          nem        [^l]en
SFX U   en          nu         [^l]en
SFX U   en          num        [^l]en
SFX U   en          nich       [^l]en
SFX U   n           ne         [^e]n
SFX U   n           ni         [^e]n
SFX U   n           nem        [^e]n
SFX U   0           u          [^e]n
SFX U   0           um         [^e]n
SFX U   n           nich       [^e]n
SFX U   t           te         t
SFX U   t           ti         t
SFX U   t           tem        t
SFX U   t           tich       t
SFX U   e           i          e
SFX U   0           m          e
SFX U   e           u          e
SFX U   e           um         e
SFX U   e           ich        e

SFX D Y 55
SFX D   es          a          es
SFX D   es          u          es
SFX D   es          ovi        es
SFX D   es          e          [^ghk]es
SFX D   es          em         es
SFX D   es          ove        es
SFX D   es          u          es
SFX D   es          um         es
SFX D   es          ech        [^ighk]es
SFX D   es          y          [^i]es
SFX D   es          ich        ies
SFX D   es          ach        kes
SFX D   es          i          ies
SFX D   os          a          os
SFX D   os          u          os
SFX D   os          ovi        os
SFX D   os          e          [^ghk]os
SFX D   os          em         os
SFX D   os          ove        os
SFX D   os          u          os
SFX D   os          um         os
SFX D   us          ech        [^ighk]os
SFX D   us          y          [^i]os
SFX D   os          ich        ios
SFX D   os          ach        kos
SFX D   os          i          ios
SFX D   us          a          us
SFX D   us          u          us
SFX D   us          ovi        us
SFX D   us          e          [^ghk]us
SFX D   us          em         us
SFX D   us          ove        us
SFX D   us          u          us
SFX D   us          um         us
SFX D   us          ech        [^eik]us
SFX D   us          y          [^ei]us
SFX D   us          ich        [ei]us
SFX D   us          ach        kus
SFX D   us          i          [ei]us
SFX D   0           e          [^eou]s
SFX D   0           e          [^asy]
SFX D   a           e          a
SFX D   ky          ek         [cdntv]ky
SFX D   y           u          [^cdntv]ky
SFX D   ny          n          any
SFX D   y           u          [^kn]y
SFX D   y           am         [cdntv]ky
SFX D   y           um         [^cdntv]ky
SFX D   y           um         [^k]y
SFX D   y           ach        [gh]y
SFX D   y           ach        [cdntv]ky
SFX D   ky          cich       [^cdntv]ky
SFX D   y           ech        [^ghk]y
SFX D   y           ich        [sz]y
SFX D   y           ami        [cdntv]ky

SFX H Y 24
SFX H   0           u          [^ey]
SFX H   0           e          [^eyghkc]
SFX H   0           em         [^ey]
SFX H   0           y          [^ey]
SFX H   0           u          [^ey]
SFX H   0           um         [^ey]
SFX H   0           ech        [^eyghk]
SFX H   g           zich       g
SFX H   h           zich       [^c]h
SFX H   ch          sich       ch
SFX H   k           cich       k
SFX H   e           u          e
SFX H   0           m          e
SFX H   e           y          e
SFX H   e           u          e
SFX H   e           um         e
SFX H   e           ech        e
SFX H   y           u          y
SFX H   y           um         y
SFX H   y           ech        [^ghk]y
SFX H   gy          zich       gy
SFX H   hy          zich       [^c]hy
SFX H   chy         sich       chy
SFX H   ky          cich       ky

SFX L Y 55
SFX L   0           a          [^nk]
SFX L   0           u          [^nk]
SFX L   0           e          [^kn]
SFX L   k           ce         yk
SFX L   0           e          [bdfmptvw]
SFX L   0           em         [^nk]
SFX L   0           y          [^nk]
SFX L   0           u          [^nk]
SFX L   0           um         [^nk]
SFX L   0           ech        [bdflmprtvz]
SFX L   0           ach        [gh]
SFX L   g           zich       g
SFX L   h           zich       [^c]h
SFX L   ch          sich       ch
SFX L   0           ich        [ccjrssz]
SFX L   ek          ka         ek
SFX L   ek          ku         ek
SFX L   ek          kem        ek
SFX L   ek          ky         ek
SFX L   ek          ku         ek
SFX L   ek          kum        ek
SFX L   ek          cich       ek
SFX L   ek          kach       icek
SFX L   0           a          [^e]k
SFX L   0           u          [^e]k
SFX L   0           em         [^e]k
SFX L   0           y          [^e]k
SFX L   0           u          [^e]k
SFX L   0           um         [^e]k
SFX L   k           cich       [^e]k
SFX L   0           a          men
SFX L   0           u          men
SFX L   0           e          men
SFX L   0           em         men
SFX L   0           y          men
SFX L   0           u          men
SFX L   0           um         men
SFX L   0           ech        men
SFX L   en          na         [^m]en
SFX L   en          nu         [^m]en
SFX L   en          ne         [^m]en
SFX L   en          nem        [^m]en
SFX L   en          ny         [^m]en
SFX L   en          nu         [^m]en
SFX L   en          num        [^m]en
SFX L   en          nech       [^m]en
SFX L   0           a          [^e]n
SFX L   0           u          [^e]n
SFX L   0           e          [^e]n
SFX L   0           e          [aeiy]n
SFX L   0           em         [^e]n
SFX L   0           y          [^e]n
SFX L   0           u          [^e]n
SFX L   0           um         [^e]n
SFX L   0           ech        [^e]n
