installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.dic
afrikanista/PD
aft/H
akupunkturista/PD
alergen/H
altsaxofonista/PD
analyzator/H
anarchokomunista/PDI
Andrej/UV
Angolan/PDI
antihumanista/PD
antisocialista/PD
aperitiv/H
Aristoteles/D
Artus/UV
assembler/H
atomista/PD
automobilista/PD
autopotah/H
Backov/L
badmintonista/PD
bachar/U
balonak/H
bandoneonista/PD
Barchov/L
Baros/UV
barytonsaxofonista/PD
Becvar/UV
Bedrichov/L
behoun/H
beletrista/PD
Berlin/L
Bezmerov/L
bezobratlovec/U
biblista/PD
bigbeat/H
Bivoj/UV
Blahonov/L
blankvers/H
Bohdalov/L
Bojanov/L
Bolivijec/U
Borovany/D
Boskovstejn/L
bourak/H
Bozejov/L
Brahms/UV
Braskov/L
Brumov/L
bruslar/U
budhista/PD
Budikov/L
Buchenwald/H
Buric/UV
Busin/L
castrista/PD
centik/H
Cihlar/UV
citerista/PD
Cizkrajov/L
coulomb/H
cvicenec/U
Cadan/PD
Castkov/L
Cerchov/L
Cerven/UV
Cesov/L
cibuk/H
ctvrtek/L
ctyrnozec/U
dadaista/PD
Debrecin/HL
deista/PD
Dekov/L
dervis/UV
destnik/H
determinista/PD
dil/H
Dobrochov/L
dodavatel/UD
dohazovac/U
dolet/H
Domanin/L
donasec/U
dorucovatel/UD
Drahlin/L
Drahon/UV
Drazov/L
dres/H
drevorytec/U
duatlonista/PD
Duchcov/L
dvacetnik/H
Efesan/PDI
ejakulator/H
ekoturista/PD
Elias/UV
enzym/H
esejista/PD
etylendibromid/H
europesimista/PD
existencialista/PD
exsocialista/PD
falsovatel/UD
Faltys/UV
fazol/H
fejetonista/PD
Filipan/PDI
Filipinec/U
flek/H
forista/PD
fotel/H
franstinar/U
Frantiskov/L
fundamentalista/PD
gamaglobulin/H
gaullista/PD
Georgijec/U
glyceryltriacetat/H
golfista/PD
Grymov/L
Guinejec/U
gyroskop/H
Haitan/PDI
handlir/U
Hazlov/L
Hebrejec/U
hendikep/H
Hermes/D
hlasista/PD
hledac/U
Hlucin/L
hodokvas/H
Hodonin/L
hofrychtar/U
Holstejn/L
homunkulus/D
Horejs/UV
Hostejov/L
Hradesin/L
hrkac/U
Hrusovany/D
hrebcin/L
hrebickovec/U
hukot/H
chaos/H
Charles/UV
chartista/PD
chlebicek/QL
Chomutov/L
chor/H
chovatel/UD
Chrzin/L
idealista/PD
indoevropeista/PD
induktor/H
internacionalista/PD
iron/H
Islandan/PD
Izaias/UV
Jahodov/L
Jares/UV
jecmen/LSR
jehovista/PD
Jemen/H
Jenkins/UV
Jeruzalem/L
Jinosov/L
Johanis/UV
judista/PD
Kacov/L
kajetan/H
kalich/L
Kalis/UV
Kanadan/PD
karafiat/H
karierista/PD
Kassovic/UV
katalyzator/H
kazatel/UD
Kaznejov/L
Kingstown/H
klestenec/U
Klicov/L
klubista/PD
knedlik/H
Kocov/L
kodovac/U
Kolsov/L
Kolumbus/D
komparator/H
kompletar/U
komponista/PD
konjunkturalista/PD
konstituent/H
konzervatorista/PD
Koren/UV
Korycany/D
korenovnik/H
kostelik/L
kout/L
Kovar/UV
Kozomin/L
kramar/U
Kratusin/L
Kretan/PD
krompac/U
Krompach/H
Krumlov/L
Kresin/L
Krivos/UV
Krtenov/L
kubista/PD
kumstyr/UV
kurt/H
Kuzelov/L
kvartetista/PD
kyslik/H
Kytin/L
Labaj/UV
Lazinov/L
lecitel/UD
legislativec/U
lept/H
letosek/L
levita/PD
Libanonec/U
Libotov/L
Lipov/L
Listany/D
logogram/H
Lochov/L
lokaj/UV
lupic/U
Lutotin/L
Makalous/UV
makaron/H
makista/PD
makrosvet/L
Malkov/L
maratonec/U
martenzit/H
Matej/UV
maximalista/PD
Mazelov/L
menhir/H
Merklin/L
meric/US
mezolit/H
Mikolaj/UV
Mikulov/L
Milicov/L
minervista/PD
minilab/H
Mirkov/L
mistodrzitel/UD
Modlikov/L
monogram/H
monoteista/PD
Moravec/UV
Mratin/L
mucitel/UD
multiservis/H
muz/UV
Nadejov/L
nadrzenec/U
nakyp/H
naplnovatel/UD
narcista/PD
Naurujec/U
Neandertal/H
Necin/L
nelezec/U
neonacista/PD
Neredin/L
neurvalec/U
nitrid/H
Nizkov/L
Nostradamus/D
novic/UV
obed/L
objednatel/UD
objednavatel/UD
obkrocak/HL
obsluhovac/U
odlesk/H
odposlouchavac/U
oktadekahydrat/H
okultista/PD
Olbramov/L
operenec/U
Oracov/L
ornat/HR
Ostravan/PD
otrhanec/UV
ovsicek/L
oxysulfid/H
Pankrac/UV
panslavista/PD
paragliding/H
patriciat/H
perkusista/PDI
perletovec/U
perm/H
Pernstejn/L
Pivrnec/UV
plakat/HR
Plutarchos/D
Pnov/L
podbijak/H
podkovar/U
podval/H
polista/PD
polooblouk/H
polyvinyl/H
pomatenec/U
Postrizin/L
postupitel/UD
posun/H
Posvar/U
prakticista/PD
prdelolezec/U
predikat/HR
pronarod/L
propylparahydroxybenzoat/H
protekcionista/PD
provinilec/U
prtak/H
pryt/H
prekladatel/UD
preslech/H
Prestanov/L
pristup/H
priznivec/U
purista/PD
pust/H
Racin/L
raketomet/H
Rapotin/L
Ratvaj/UV
redemptorista/PD
relaps/H
rock/H
rokovatel/UD
Rostov/L
rozervanec/U
rozlet/H
Ryc/UV
rychlik/H
Rychnov/L
riditel/UD
samohyb/H
samotar/U
Savin/L
sberatel/UD
semestr/H
Servac/UV
severomoravan/PDI
schilling/H
sjednotitel/UD
skorbut/H
Skrychov/L
slidic/U
Smrzov/L
snop/H
socialista/PD
spac/U
spar/H
spiritista/PD
spoluzakladatel/UD
spravce/UV
stator/H
Stochov/L
strojvudce/U
strom/HR
Stropesin/L
stradatel/UD
sulfochlorid/H
svetlonos/U
Svetnov/L
svod/HR
sachista/PD
Sachov/L
sifon/H
simpanz/U
Sluknov/L
Stahlavy/HQ
stvanec/U
Svihov/L
Tallinn/H
talmudista/PD
teorem/H
Terc/UV
tesitel/UD
Tetin/L
tis/H
transvestita/PD
trip/H
trojuhelnik/HL
troudnatec/U
Tvrdkov/L
tympanista/PD
udavatel/UD
uklad/H
ultranacionalista/PD
unor/L
Urbanovic/UV
utlacovatel/UD
Varazdin/L
Vasa/UV
vaznik/H
Velichov/L
verista/PD
veznitel/UD
Vincencov/L
vkus/HN
vodohospodar/U
Vojtanov/L
volejbalista/PD
vsevladce/U
vymahac/U
vymet/H
Vyrov/L
Vysocany/D
vyvrzenec/U
York/H
Zambijec/U
zapadoevropan/PD
Zavlekov/L
zbabelec/U
Zlonin/L
zmocnenec/U
zmocnitel/UD
zob/H
zadatel/UD
zivitel/UD
Zumberk/L
